Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1322
Annexation, merger, or consolidation; established service award benefit program; effect.

Whenever by reason of annexation, merger, or consolidation a city, village, or rural or suburban fire protection district conducting a service award benefit program ceases to exist and becomes part of another city, village, or rural or suburban fire protection district which is conducting a service award benefit program, the annual accounts and certification lists of the city, village, or rural or suburban fire protection district which has ceased to exist shall be transferred and merged with the annual accounts and certification lists of the other city, village, or rural or suburban fire protection district. For purposes of the Volunteer Emergency Responders Recruitment and Retention Act, the prior participation of volunteers in the program of the city, village, or rural or suburban fire protection district which has ceased to exist up to the date upon which such body ceased to exist shall be treated as if the participation had been in the program of the other city, village, or rural or suburban fire protection district.

Laws 1999, LB 849, § 22.